Illinois, session 104th, SB1197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 31-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/31-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 31-1)7    Sec. 31-1. Resisting or obstructing a peace officer, 8firefighter, or correctional institution employee.9    (a) A person who knowingly:10        (1) resists arrest, or11        (2) obstructs the performance by one known to the 12    person to be a peace officer, firefighter, or correctional 13    institution employee of any authorized act within his or 14    her official capacity commits a Class A misdemeanor.15    (a-5) In addition to any other sentence that may be 16imposed, a court shall order any person convicted of resisting 17or obstructing a peace officer, firefighter, or correctional 18institution employee to be sentenced to a minimum of 48 19consecutive hours of imprisonment or ordered to perform 20community service for not less than 100 hours as may be 21determined by the court. The person shall not be eligible for 22probation in order to reduce the sentence of imprisonment or 23community service.  SB1197- 2 -LRB104 03901 RLC 13925 b1    (a-7) A person convicted for a violation of this Section 2whose violation was the proximate cause of an injury to a peace 3officer, firefighter, or correctional institution employee is 4guilty of a Class 4 felony.5    (b) For purposes of this Section, "correctional 6institution employee" means any person employed to supervise 7and control inmates incarcerated in a penitentiary, State 8farm, reformatory, prison, jail, house of correction, police 9detention area, half-way house, or other institution or place 10for the incarceration or custody of persons under sentence for 11offenses or awaiting trial or sentence for offenses, under 12arrest for an offense, a violation of probation, a violation 13of parole, a violation of aftercare release, a violation of 14mandatory supervised release, or awaiting a hearing or 15preliminary hearing on setting the conditions of pretrial 16release, or who are sexually dangerous persons or who are 17sexually violent persons; and "firefighter" means any 18individual, either as an employee or volunteer, of a regularly 19constituted fire department of a municipality or fire 20protection district who performs fire fighting duties, 21including, but not limited to, the fire chief, assistant fire 22chief, captain, engineer, driver, ladder person, hose person, 23pipe person, and any other member of a regularly constituted 24fire department. "Firefighter" also means a person employed by 25the Office of the State Fire Marshal to conduct arson 26investigations.  SB1197- 3 -LRB104 03901 RLC 13925 b1    (c) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this 2Section if a person resists or obstructs the performance of 3one known by the person to be a firefighter by returning to or 4remaining in a dwelling, residence, building, or other 5structure to rescue or to attempt to rescue any person.6    (d) A person shall not be subject to arrest for resisting 7arrest under this Section unless there is an underlying 8offense for which the person was initially subject to arrest.9(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21.)